District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.20

Involuntary dissolution — Answer of corporation.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1319, ch. 854, § 787
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-221.20.
1981 Ed., § 29-420.
1973 Ed., § 29-720.